Utah statutes.
62A-15-618.   Designated examiners -- Fees.

Designated examiners shall be allowed a reasonable fee by the county legislative body of the county in which the proposed patient resides or is found, unless they are otherwise paid.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

